Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1.1. Medical Care Facilities Certificate of Public Need.
§ 32.1-102.3:2.
Certificates of public need; applications to be filed in response to Requests for Applications (RFAs).

Except for applications for continuing care retirement community nursing home bed projects filed by continuing care providers registered with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 which comply with the requirements established in this section, the Commissioner shall approve, authorize or accept applications for the issuance of any certificate of public need pursuant to this article only in response to Requests for Applications (RFAs) for any project which would result in an increase in the number of beds in a planning district in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided, except as provided in §

32.1-102.3:7

.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing standards for the approval and issuance of Requests for Applications by the Commissioner. The standards shall include, but shall not be limited to, a requirement that determinations of need take into account any limitations on access to existing nursing home beds in the planning districts. The RFAs, which shall be published at least annually, shall be jointly developed by the Department and the Department of Medical Assistance Services. RFAs shall be based on analyses of the need, or lack thereof, for increases in the nursing home bed supply in each of the Commonwealth’s planning districts in accordance with standards adopted by the Board by regulation. The Commissioner shall only accept for review applications in response to such RFAs which conform with the geographic and bed need determinations of the specific RFA.

Sixty days prior to the Commissioner’s approval and issuance of any RFA, the Board shall publish the proposed RFA in the Virginia Register for public comment together with an explanation of (i) the regulatory basis for the planning district bed needs set forth in the RFA and (ii) the rationale for the RFA’s planning district designations. Any person objecting to the contents of the proposed RFA may notify, within 14 days of the publication, the Board and the Commissioner of his objection and the objection’s regulatory basis. The Commissioner shall prepare, and deliver by registered mail, a written response to each such objection within two weeks of the date of receiving the objection. The objector may file a rebuttal to the Commissioner’s response in writing within five days of receiving the Commissioner’s response. If objections are received, the Board may, after considering the provisions of the RFA, any objections, the Commissioner’s responses, and if filed, any written rebuttals of the Commissioner’s responses, hold a public hearing to receive comments on the specific RFA. Prior to making a decision on the RFA, the Commissioner shall consider any recommendations made by the Board.

Except for a continuing care retirement community applying for a certificate of public need pursuant to provisions of subsections A, B, and C, applications for continuing care retirement community nursing home bed projects shall be accepted by the Commissioner only if the following criteria are met: (i) the facility is registered with the State Corporation Commission as a continuing care provider pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2, (ii) the number of new nursing home beds requested in the initial application does not exceed the lesser of 20 percent of the continuing care retirement community’s total number of beds that are not nursing home beds or 60 beds, (iii) the number of new nursing home beds requested in any subsequent application does not cause the continuing care retirement community’s total number of nursing home beds to exceed 20 percent of its total number of beds that are not nursing home beds, and (iv) the continuing care retirement community has established a qualified resident assistance policy.

The Commissioner may approve an initial certificate of public need for nursing home beds in a continuing care retirement community not to exceed the lesser of 60 beds or 20 percent of the total number of beds that are not nursing home beds which authorizes an initial one-time, three-year open admission period during which the continuing care retirement community may accept direct admissions into its nursing home beds. The Commissioner may approve a certificate of public need for nursing home beds in a continuing care retirement community in addition to those nursing home beds requested for the initial one-time, three-year open admission period if (i) the number of new nursing home beds requested in any subsequent application does not cause the continuing care retirement community’s total number of nursing home beds to exceed 20 percent of its total number of beds that are not nursing beds, (ii) the number of licensed nursing home beds within the continuing care retirement community does not and will not exceed 20 percent of the number of occupied beds that are not nursing beds, and (iii) no open-admission period is allowed for these nursing home beds. Upon the expiration of any initial one-time, three-year open admission period, a continuing care retirement community which has obtained a certificate of public need for a nursing facility project pursuant to subsection D may admit into its nursing home beds (a) a standard contract holder who has been a bona fide resident of the non-nursing home portion of the continuing care retirement community for at least 30 days, (b) a person who is a standard contract holder who has lived in the non-nursing home portion of the continuing care retirement community for less than 30 days but who requires nursing home care due to change in health status since admission to the continuing care retirement community, (c) a person who is a family member of a standard contract holder residing in a non-nursing home portion of the continuing care retirement community, (d) a person who is an employee or a member of the board of trustees or board of directors of the continuing care retirement community, (e) a person who is a family member of an employee or a member of the board of trustees or board of directors of the continuing care retirement community, or (f) a person who is an accredited practitioner of the religious organization or denomination with which the continuing care retirement community is affiliated.

Any continuing care retirement community applicant for a certificate of public need to increase the number of nursing home beds shall authorize the State Corporation Commission to disclose such information to the Commissioner as may be in the State Corporation Commission’s possession concerning such continuing care retirement community in order to allow the Commissioner to enforce the provisions of this section. The State Corporation Commission shall provide the Commissioner with the requested information when so authorized.

For the purposes of this section:“Family member” means spouse, mother, father, son, daughter, brother, sister, aunt, uncle, or cousin by blood, marriage, or adoption.“One-time, three-year open admission period” means the three years after the initial licensure of nursing home beds during which the continuing care retirement community may take admissions directly into its nursing home beds without the signing of a standard contract. The facility or a related facility on the same campus shall not be granted any open admissions period for any subsequent application or authorization for nursing home beds.“Qualified resident assistance policy” means a procedure, consistently followed by a facility, pursuant to which the facility endeavors to avoid requiring a resident to leave the facility because of inability to pay regular charges and which complies with the requirements of the Internal Revenue Service for maintenance of status as a tax exempt charitable organization under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. This policy shall be (i) generally made known to residents through the resident contract and (ii) supported by reasonable and consistent efforts to promote the availability of funds, either through a special fund, separate foundation or access to other available funds, to assist residents who are unable to pay regular charges in whole or in part.This policy may (a) take into account the sound financial management of the facility, including existing reserves, and the reasonable requirements of lenders and (b) include requirements that residents seeking such assistance provide all requested financial information and abide by reasonable conditions, including seeking to qualify for other assistance and restrictions on the transfer of assets to third parties.A qualified resident assistance policy shall not constitute the business of insurance as defined in Chapter 1 (§

38.2-100

et seq.) of Title 38.2.“Standard contract” means a contract requiring the same entrance fee, terms, and conditions as contracts executed with residents of the non-nursing home portion of the facility, if the entrance fee is no less than the amount defined in §

38.2-4900

.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit or prevent a continuing care retirement community from discharging a resident (i) for breach of nonfinancial contract provisions, (ii) if medically appropriate care can no longer be provided to the resident, or (iii) if the resident is a danger to himself or others while in the facility.

The provisions of subsections D, E, and H shall not affect any certificate of public need issued prior to July 1, 1998; however, any certificate of public need application for additional nursing home beds shall be subject to the provisions of this act.

History.

1989, c. 517; 1990, cc. 191, 478, 753, 845; 1991, c. 561; 1992, cc. 612, 682; 1993, cc. 347, 474, 540, 564, 704, 762, 957, 993; 1994, cc. 57, 680, 711, 726, 797; 1995, cc. 505, 632, 641, 695, 753; 1996, cc. 531, 849, 901; 1998, c. 794; 2009, c. 175; 2012, c. 492; 2013, cc. 433, 515.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be implemented to the extent funds are appropriated therefor. ” See Acts 1993, c. 994, item 381 B, which relates to the extent funds have been appropriated for Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993.

Acts 1996, c. 531, cl. 3 provides: “[t]hat, except for this enactment clause, this act shall expire on July 1, 1996, unless the moratorium provided in §

32.1-102.3:2

remains in effect on July 1, 1996; the Commissioner, however, shall continue to review and may approve any applications accepted for review prior to July 1, 1996, pursuant to the exceptions included in §

32.1-102.3:2

, as it was in effect on the date this act becomes effective. The Commissioner shall take final action on all such applications by December 31, 1996.”
The moratorium did not remain in effect on July 1, 1996, having been eliminated by Acts 1996, c. 901. Therefore, the amendment by c. 531 expired on July 1, 1996.

Acts 1996, c. 849, cl. 2 provides: “That, except for this enactment clause, this act shall expire on July 2, 1996, unless the moratorium provided in §

32.1-102.3:2

remains in effect. The Commissioner, however, shall continue to review and may approve any applications accepted for review through July 1, 1996, pursuant to the exceptions included in §

32.1-102.3:2

, as it was in effect on the date this act becomes effective. The Commissioner shall take final action on all such applications by December 31, 1996.” The moratorium did not remain in effect, having been eliminated by Acts 1996, c. 901. Therefore, the amendment by c. 849 expired on July 2, 1996.

Acts 2008, c. 802, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That, notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, any regulations of the Board of Health, or provisions of any current Request For Applications, the State Health Commissioner may issue a Request For Applications for 120 new nursing home or nursing facility beds in Planning District 3 when the Division of Certificate of Public Need of the Department of Health has determined, in its ‘Nursing Home Facility Beds and Utilization — Facility Fiscal Years Ending in 2006’ analysis, that at least one nursing facility in Planning District 3 is licensed for 120 beds but operated no Medicaid-certified beds in 2006.

“The Commissioner may accept applications for such 120 nursing home or nursing facility beds and may issue a certificate of public need for an increase of such 120 new beds in which nursing facility or extended care services are to be provided to establish a new facility in Planning District 3. The Commissioner shall consider any certificate of public need for the 120 beds to an applicant that proposes to establish a new nursing facility located within three miles of the boundary of the county seat or within the county seat of the county adjacent to the city or county in which is sited any facility in Planning District 3 determined by the Division of Certificate of Public Need, in its ‘Nursing Home Facility Beds and Utilization — Facility Fiscal Years Ending in 2006’ analysis, to be licensed for 120 beds but that operated no Medicaid-certified beds in 2006.”

Acts 2009, c. 394 provides: “§ 1. Amendment of certain certificate of public need authorized.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 10 of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia as in effect on June 30, 1996, or the provisions of Chapter 868 of the Acts of Assembly of 2000, Chapter 486 of the Acts of Assembly of 2003, and Chapter 776 of the Acts of Assembly of 2006, the Commissioner of Health may accept and approve a request, pursuant to this act, to amend the conditions of a certificate of need issued for an increase in beds in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided to allow such facility to continue to admit persons, other than residents of the cooperative units, to its nursing facility beds through June 30, 2012, when such facility (i) is operated by an association described in § 55-458 of the Code of Virginia; (ii) was created in connection with a real estate cooperative; (iii) offers its residents a level of nursing services consistent with the definition of continuing care in Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 of the Code of Virginia; and (iv) was issued a certificate of need prior to October 3, 1995.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” was substituted for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation, and Substance Abuse Services” to conform to the name change by Acts 2009, cc. 813 and 840.

Acts 2010, c. 623, cl. 1 provides: “Notwithstanding (i) the provisions of §§

32.1-102.3

and

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) any regulations of the Board of Health establishing standards for the approval and issuance of Requests for Applications, and (iii) any current Requests for Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and review applications in any certificate of public need Batch Group G review cycle and may issue certificates of public need for the establishment of a psychiatric service as the result of a relocation of psychiatric beds from one hospital in Planning District 5 to another hospital in Planning District 5. No psychiatric beds relocated from one hospital to another hospital in Planning District 5 to establish a new psychiatric service shall be converted to any use other than inpatient psychiatric care.”

Acts 2010, c. 688 provides: “§ 1. Amendment of certain certificate of public need authorized.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health may accept and approve a request to amend the conditions of a certificate of public need issued to a continuing care provider registered with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 of the Code of Virginia in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided to allow such continuing care provider to continue to admit community patients, other than contract holders, to its nursing facility beds through December 31, 2013, if the following conditions are met: (i) the facility is located within the City of Norfolk and operated as a not-for-profit and (ii) the facility’s contract holder occupancy rate is less than 85 percent at the time of such application.”

Acts 2011, cc. 19 and 20, effective March 7, 2011, provides: “§ 1. That, notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, any regulations of the Board of Health, or provisions of any current Request for Applications, the Commissioner of Health shall accept applications for, including applications filed prior to the passage of this act, and may issue a certificate of public need authorizing an increase of no more than 50 nursing home beds for the establishment of a new 90-bed nursing home in Planning District 11, provided that (i) any such application to establish a new 90-bed nursing home in Planning District 11 shall also propose the replacement and relocation of all nursing home beds of an existing nursing home located in Planning District 11, licensed as of December 31, 2010, of no more than 45 licensed beds, all of which shall be relocated to the new 90-bed nursing home; (ii) Virginia Health Information shall have reported that the fiscal year 2009 occupancy rate of the nursing home to be replaced was at least 85 percent; and (iii) such new 90-bed nursing home shall be located in the city or county that is adjacent to the city or county of the nursing home that shall be replaced and relocated.”

Acts 2011, cc. 130 and 174 provide:
“§ 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and may approve a request to amend the conditions of a certificate of public need issued to a continuing care provider registered with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 of the Code of Virginia in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided to allow such continuing care provider to continue to admit community patients, other than contract holders, to its nursing facility beds through December 31, 2014, if the following conditions are met: (i) the facility is located within the County of Botetourt and operated as a not-for-profit and (ii) the facility’s contract holder occupancy rate is less than 85 percent at the time of such application.”

Acts 2011, c. 167 provides: “§ 1. Amendment of certain certificate of public need authorized.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision E of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and may approve a request to amend the conditions of a certificate of public need issued to a continuing care provider registered with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 of the Code of Virginia in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided to allow such continuing care provider to continue to admit community patients, other than contract holders, to its nursing facility beds through December 31, 2014, if the following conditions are met: (i) the facility is located within the City of Suffolk and operated as a not-for-profit and (ii) the facility’s contract holder occupancy rate is less than 85 percent at the time of such application.”

Acts 2011, c. 386 provides: “§ 1. Amendment of certain certificate of public need authorized.

“Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 10 of §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia as in effect on June 30, 1996, or the provisions of Chapter 868 of the Acts of Assembly of 2000, Chapter 486 of the Acts of Assembly of 2003, Chapter 776 of the Acts of Assembly of 2006, and Chapter 394 of the Acts of Assembly of 2009, the Commissioner of Health may accept and approve a request, pursuant to this act, to amend the conditions of a certificate of need issued for an increase in beds in which nursing facility or extended care services are provided to allow such facility to continue to admit persons, other than residents of the cooperative units, to its nursing facility beds when such facility (i) is operated by an association described in § 55-458 of the Code of Virginia; (ii) was created in connection with a real estate cooperative; (iii) offers its residents a level of nursing services consistent with the definition of continuing care in Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 of the Code of Virginia; and (iv) was issued a certificate of need prior to October 3, 1995.”

Acts 2011, c. 395, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding (i) the provisions of §§

32.1-102.3

and

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) any regulations of the Board of Health establishing standards for the approval and issuance of Requests for Applications, and (iii) any current Requests for Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Health shall accept and review applications and may issue certificates of public need for the addition of up to 10 Medicaid-eligible nursing home beds for a certified nursing home licensed for less than 60 beds, which is operated not for profit, is located in Planning District 15 but accepts patients from areas of the Commonwealth outside of the planning district, and provides care for patients regardless of ability to pay.”

Acts 2011, c. 395, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2011 Regular Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor and becomes law.” Funding was provided by the 2011 Appropriation Act.

Acts 2012, c. 301, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health, in consultation with stakeholders including but not limited to representatives of the Virginia Health Care Association, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, and the Virginia Association of Nonprofit Homes for the Aging shall (i) review the provisions of §

32.1-102.3:5

and develop recommendations related to the Commissioner’s acceptance of applications for relocation of nursing home beds without prior issuance of a Request for Applications, and (ii) review provisions of §

32.1-102.3:2

related to continuing care retirement community open admissions periods and develop criteria and procedures for extensions of open admissions periods that include provisions for notice and written comment.”

Acts 2012, c. 301, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not prevent any entity that has relocated beds pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:5

of the Code of Virginia and thereafter given the Commissioner of Health notice of its intention to close the facility on or before January 15, 2012, from relocating the remaining beds to another facility, either existing or new, under common ownership and control nor shall the provisions of this act prevent the Commissioner of Health from accepting an application and issuing a certificate of public need for such relocation.”

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act related to an open admission period for nursing facilities of continuing care retirement communities shall only apply to facilities for which an application for an initial three year open admission period was accepted by the Commissioner of Health on or after July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commissioner shall accept and may approve applications for a three year open admission period for a continuing care retirement community approved as part of a certificate of public need issued pursuant to subsection E of §

32.1-102.3:2

prior to July 1, 2013 if the continuing care retirement community for which the open admissions period is sought (i) operates as a not-for-profit facility and (ii) can demonstrate that the facility’s average contract holder occupancy rate over the six month period immediately preceding submission of the application, as reported to the nonprofit organization with which the Commissioner has entered into a contract pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

, was less than 85 percent.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, deleted “of Health” following “Commissioner,” “Board” and “Department” throughout the section; in subsection A, deleted “only” preceding “approve,” inserted “only in response to Requests for Applications (RFAs)” and the clause (i) designation, substituted “extended care, psychiatric, or substance abuse treatment services are provided” for “or, extended care services are provided when such applications are filed in response to Requests For Applications (RFAs)” and added clause (ii) and made a related change; rewrote subsection B; and substituted “RFA” for “Request For Applications” in the first and last sentences of subsection C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 492, in subsection A, deleted the clause (i) designator and substituted “or extended care services are provided” for “extended care, psychiatric, or substance abuse treatment services are provided, or (ii) the establishment of new psychiatric or substance abuse treatment services”; in subsection B, deleted “psychiatric, or substance abuse treatment beds, or psychiatric or substance abuse services” following “nursing home beds” in the second sentence, substituted “the Department of Medical Assistance Services” for “(i) in the case of nursing home beds, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, or (ii) in the case of psychiatric or substance abuse treatment beds or services, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” in the third sentence, substituted “nursing home bed supply” for “nursing home psychiatric, or substance abuse treatment bed supply or psychiatric or substance abuse treatment services” in the fourth sentence, and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “Any conversion of psychiatric or substance abuse treatment beds approved pursuant to this section to nonpsychiatric or non-substance abuse treatment inpatient beds shall constitute a project and shall be reviewable pursuant to this article”; deleted “above” following “subsections A, B, and C” in subsection D; redesignated former clauses (i) through (iii) designators as clause (a) through (c) designators in the last sentence of subsection E; redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) designators as clauses (a) and (b) designators in the next-to-last paragraph of the definition of “Qualified resident assistance policy” in subsection G; and deleted “of this section” following “subsections D, E and H” in subsection I.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 433, in subsection E, added clause (d) through (f) and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment by c. 515 added “except as provided in §

32.1-102.3:7

” at the end of subsection A. For applicability, see Editor’s notes.

§ 32.1-102.3:2.1.
Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 794.

§ 32.1-102.3:2.2.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1997, c. 568, effective March 20, 1997, and expired July 1, 1998, pursuant to the terms of Acts 1997, c. 568, cl. 3.

§§ 32.1-102.3:3,
32.1-102.3:4.

Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 612.

§§ 32.1-102.3:5,
32.1-102.3:6.

Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 301, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-102.3:5

, pertaining to relocation of certain nursing home beds under limited circumstances, derived from Acts 2007, c. 398; 2009, c. 175; 2011, c. 181.

Former § 32.1-102.3:6, pertaining to certificates for certain nursing home beds, derived from Acts 2010, cc. 54, 408.

§ 32.1-102.3:7.
Application for transfer of nursing facility beds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-102.3:2

, the Commissioner shall accept and may approve applications for the transfer of nursing facility beds from one planning district to another planning district when no Request for Applications has been issued in cases in which the applicant can demonstrate (i) there is a shortage of nursing facility beds in the planning district to which beds are proposed to be transferred, (ii) the number of nursing facility beds in the planning district from which beds are proposed to be moved exceeds the need for such beds, (iii) the proposed transfer of nursing facility beds would not result in creation of a need for additional beds in the planning district from which the beds are proposed to be transferred, and (iv) the nursing facility beds proposed to be transferred will be made available to individuals in need of nursing facility services in the planning district to which they are proposed to be transferred without regard to the source of payment for such services.

Applications received pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of this article governing review of applications for certificate of public need.

History.

2013, c. 515.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act related to an open admission period for nursing facilities of continuing care retirement communities shall only apply to facilities for which an application for an initial three year open admission period was accepted by the Commissioner of Health on or after July 1, 2013.”

§ 32.1-102.3:8.
Application for an open admission period for a continuing care retirement community.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-102.3:2

, the Commissioner shall accept and may approve applications for a two-year or three-year open admission period for a continuing care retirement community nursing facility approved as part of an initial certificate of public need pursuant to subsection E of §

32.1-102.3:2

.

Any person seeking an open admission period pursuant to subsection A shall provide written notice of the proposed open admission period to all nursing facilities located within the planning district. The Commissioner shall accept public comment on an application for an open admission period pursuant to subsection A for a period of 14 days following submission of the application.

History.

2013, c. 515.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 515, c. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act, which shall include criteria for an open admission period for a continuing care retirement community pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:8

.”

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act related to an open admission period for nursing facilities of continuing care retirement communities shall only apply to facilities for which an application for an initial three year open admission period was accepted by the Commissioner of Health on or after July 1, 2013.”